sl-SI: Primer uporabe cofaste obrobe: Oblačila in moda; Torbe in dodatki; Posteljnina; Kostum; Zavese in draperije; Naredi sam za dom; Zavijanje daril; Nakit in dodatki; Dekoracija za zabave in dogodke; Vzglavniki in blazine; Izdelovanje albumov/rokodelstvo s papirjem; Oblazinjenje; Drugo
nl: Kwastfranje toepassing: Kleding en mode; Tassen en accessoires; Beddengoed; Kostuum; Gordijnen en draperieën; Doe-het-zelf-woondecoratie; Cadeauverpakking; Sieraden en accessoires; Feest- en evenementendecoratie; Kussens; Scrapbooking/papierknutselen; Meubelstoffering; Overig
cs: Použití třásňové lemovky: Oblečení a móda; Tašky a doplňky; Lůžkoviny; Kostýmy; Záclony a závěsy; DIY domácí dekorace; Balení dárků; Šperky a doplňky; Výzdoba na párty a akce; Polštáře a podušky; Scrapbooking / tvoření z papíru; Čalounění; Jiné
da: Anvendelsesområde for kvastbånd: Beklædning og mode; Tasker og tilbehør; Sengetøj; Kostume; Gardiner og forhæng; Gør det selv-boligindretning; Gaveindpakning; Smykker og tilbehør; Fest- og eventindretning; Puder og hynder; Scrapbog/papirklip; Møbelpolstring; Andet
pt-BR: Guarnição de tassel caso de uso: Vestuário e moda; Bolsas e acessórios; Roupas de cama; Fantasia; Cortinas; Decoração de casa DIY; Embalagem de presente; Joias e acessórios; Decoração de festas e eventos; Travesseiros e almofadas; Scrapbook/artesanato em papel; Estofamento; Outros
pl: Zastosowanie taśmy z frędzlami: Odzież i moda; Torby i akcesoria; Pościel; Kostiumy; Zasłony i firany; Dekoracje wnętrz DIY; Pakowanie prezentów; Biżuteria i akcesoria; Dekoracje na imprezy i wydarzenia; Poduszki i poszewki; Scrapbooking / rękodzieło z papieru; Tapicerka; Inne
ru: Назначение бахромы с кисточками: Одежда и мода; Сумки и аксессуары; Постельное бельё; Костюмы; Шторы и портьеры; Домашний декор своими руками; Упаковка подарков; Украшения и аксессуары; Декор для вечеринок и мероприятий; Подушки; Скрапбукинг/поделки из бумаги; Обивка; Другое
ja: タッセルトリム用途: アパレル＆ファッション; バッグ＆アクセサリー; 寝具; コスチューム; カーテン＆ドレープ; DIYホームデコ; ギフトラッピング; ジュエリー＆アクセサリー; パーティー＆イベント装飾; 枕＆クッション; スクラップブッキング/ペーパークラフト; 室内装飾品; その他
lt-LT: Kutų juostos paskirtis: Apranga ir mada; Krepšiai ir aksesuarai; Patalynė; Kostiumai; Užuolaidos ir draperijos; „Pasidaryk pats“ namų dekoras; Dovanų pakavimas; Papuošalai ir aksesuarai; Vakarėlių ir renginių dekoras; Pagalvės ir pagalvėlės; Iškarpų albumai / popieriaus dirbiniai; Apmušalai; Kita
el: Παράδειγμα χρήσης διακοσμητικής τρέσας: Ένδυση και μόδα; Τσάντες και αξεσουάρ; Κλινοσκεπάσματα; Κοστούμια; Κουρτίνες και υφάσματα; DIY διακόσμηση σπιτιού; Περιτύλιγμα δώρων; Κοσμήματα και αξεσουάρ; Διακόσμηση πάρτι και εκδηλώσεων; Μαξιλάρια; Scrapbooking/χαρτοτεχνίες; Ταπετσαρίες; Άλλο
ko: 태슬 트림 용도: 의류 및 패션; 가방 및 액세서리; 침구; 코스튬; 커튼 및 드레이퍼리; DIY 홈 데코; 선물 포장; 주얼리 및 액세서리; 파티 및 이벤트 데코; 베개 및 쿠션; 스크랩북/종이 공예; 실내 장식; 기타
ro-RO: Caz de utilizare pentru panglica cu ciucuri: Îmbrăcăminte și modă; Genți și accesorii; Lenjerie de pat; Costume; Perdele și draperii; Decorațiuni interioare DIY; Împachetare cadouri; Bijuterii și accesorii; Decorațiuni pentru petreceri și evenimente; Perne și perne decorative; Scrapbooking/artizanat din hârtie; Tapițerie; Altele
vi: Trường hợp sử dụng viền tua rua: Quần áo & thời trang; Túi xách & phụ kiện; Bộ chăn ga gối; Trang phục hóa trang; Rèm cửa & màn; Tự trang trí nhà cửa; Gói quà; Trang sức & phụ kiện; Trang trí tiệc & sự kiện; Gối & đệm; Trang trí sổ lưu niệm/thủ công trên giấy; Bọc nội thất; Khác
hu: Bojtos szegély felhasználási területe: Ruházat és divat; Táskák és kiegészítők; Ágynemű; Jelmez; Függönyök és sötétítők; DIY lakberendezés; Ajándékcsomagolás; Ékszerek és kiegészítők; Party és rendezvény dekoráció; Párnák és díszpárnák; Scrapbook / papír kézművesség; Kárpitozás; Egyéb
nb: Brukstilfelle for duskkant: Klær og mote; Vesker og tilbehør; Sengetøy; Kostyme; Gardiner og forheng; DIY-hjemmeinnredning; Gaveinnpakning; Smykker og tilbehør; Fest- og arrangementsdekor; Puter; Scrapbooking / papirhobby; Møbeltrekk; Annet
tr: Püskül şeridin temel kullanım alanını belirtir.: Giyim ve moda; Çanta ve aksesuarlar; Nevresim; Kostüm; Perde ve kumaşlar; Kendin yap ev dekorasyonu; Hediye paketi; Takı ve aksesuarlar; Parti ve etkinlik dekorasyonu; Yastık ve kırlentler; Albüm yapımı/kağıt el sanatları; Döşeme; Diğer
de: Verwendungszweck der Quastenborte: Bekleidung & Mode; Taschen & Accessoires; Bettwäsche; Kostüme; Vorhänge & Gardinen; DIY-Heimdekor; Geschenkverpackung; Schmuck & Accessoires; Party- & Eventdekor; Kissen; Scrapbooking/Papierbasteln; Polstermöbel; Sonstige
th: การตกแต่งด้วยพู่: เครื่องแต่งกายและแฟชั่น; กระเป๋าและเครื่องประดับ; เครื่องนอน; ชุดคอสตูม; ผ้าม่าน; ของตกแต่งบ้าน DIY; ห่อของขวัญ; เครื่องประดับและแอกเซสซอรี; ตกแต่งงานปาร์ตี้และอีเวนต์; หมอนและเบาะรองนั่ง; สมุดภาพ/งานประดิษฐ์จากกระดาษ; ผ้าบุเฟอร์นิเจอร์; อื่นๆ
en: Tassel trim use case: Apparel & fashion; Bags & accessories; Bedding; Costume; Curtains & drapery; DIY home décor; Gift wrapping; Jewelry & accessories; Party & event décor; Pillows & cushions; Scrapbooking/paper crafts; Upholstery; Other
sv: Användningsområde för tofskant: Kläder och mode; Väskor och accessoarer; Sängkläder; Dräkter; Gardiner och draperier; DIY-heminredning; Presentinslagning; Smycken och accessoarer; Fest- och evenemangsdekoration; Prydnadskuddar; Scrapbooking/papperspyssel; Möbelklädsel; Annat
sk-SK: Použitie strapcového lemu: Odevy a móda; Tašky a doplnky; Posteľná bielizeň; Kostýmy; Závesy a záclony; DIY domáce dekorácie; Balenie darčekov; Šperky a doplnky; Párty a eventové dekorácie; Vankúše a podušky; Scrapbooking / tvorba z papiera; Čalúnenie; Iné
zh-CN: 流苏饰边用途: 服装与时尚; 包袋与配饰; 床上用品; 戏服; 窗帘和布艺; DIY 居家装饰; 礼物包装; 珠宝与配饰; 派对和活动装饰; 枕头和靠垫; 剪贴簿/纸工艺品; 室内装潢; 其他
fr: Usage de la frange à pompons: Vêtements et mode; Sacs et accessoires; Literie; Costume; Rideaux et tentures; Décoration d’intérieur à faire soi-même; Emballage cadeau; Bijoux et accessoires; Décoration de fêtes et événements; Oreillers et coussins; Scrapbooking/créations en papier; Tapisserie d’ameublement; Autre
fi: Tupsunauhan käyttökohde: Vaatteet ja muoti; Laukut ja asusteet; Vuodevaatteet; Naamiaisasut; Verhot ja draperiat; Tee-se-itse-sisustus; Lahjapaketointi; Korut ja asusteet; Juhla- ja tapahtumasisustus; Tyynyt ja koristetyynyt; Leikekirjat/paperiaskartelu; Verhoilu; Muu
zh-TW: 流蘇飾邊使用場景: 服飾與流行; 包包與配件; 寢具; 戲服; 窗簾與帷幔; DIY 家居裝飾; 禮品包裝; 珠寶與配件; 派對與活動裝飾; 枕頭與靠墊; 剪貼簿/紙工藝; 室內裝潢; 其他
it: Caso d'uso del bordo con frange: Abbigliamento e moda; Borse e accessori; Biancheria da letto; Costumi; Tende e tendaggi; Arredamento casa fai-da-te; Confezioni regalo; Gioielli e accessori; Decorazioni per feste ed eventi; Cuscini; Scrapbooking/lavoretti con la carta; Tappezzeria; Altro
es: Caso de uso del adorno de borla: Ropa y moda; Bolsos y accesorios; Ropa de cama; Disfraces; Cortinas y cortinajes; Decoración del hogar de bricolaje; Envoltura de regalos; Joyería y accesorios; Decoración de fiestas y eventos; Almohadas y cojines; Álbumes de recortes/manualidades en papel; Tapicería; Otro
pt-PT: Caso de utilização da fita de borlas: Vestuário e moda; Sacos e acessórios; Roupa de cama; Disfarces; Cortinas e cortinados; Decoração de casa DIY; Embrulhos; Joalharia e acessórios; Decoração de festas e eventos; Almofadas; Scrapbooking/artesanato em papel; Estofos; Outro
hr-HR: Ukras s resicama koristi kutiju: Odjeća i moda; Torbe i dodaci; Posteljina; Kostimi; Zavjese i dekori; Uradi sam (DIY) uređenje doma; Zamatanje poklona; Nakit i dodaci; Dekoracije za zabave i događaje; Jastuci i jastučići; Scrapbooking / izrada od papira; Presvlake; Ostalo
bg-BG: Предназначение на пискюлната украса: Облекло и мода; Чанти и аксесоари; Спално бельо; Костюми; Завеси и драперии; Домашен декор тип „Направи си сам“; Опаковане на подаръци; Бижута и аксесоари; Декор за партита и събития; Възглавници; Скрапбукинг/занаяти от хартия; Тапицерия; Друго